Utah statutes.
77-30-16.   Amount of bail.

(1)  Except as provided in Subsection (2), a judge or magistrate in this state may admit the person arrested to bail by bond with sufficient sureties and in an amount he considers proper, conditioned for his appearance before him at a time specified in the bond and for his surrender, to be arrested upon the warrant of the governor of this state.

(2)  A person arrested under Section 77-30-13 shall be admitted to bail as a matter of right, except the court has discretion to deny bail as provided in Utah Constitution Article I, Section 8, and when a judge or magistrate in the demanding state has ordered that the person charged be held without bail or the person has waived extradition.

(3)  There is a rebuttable presumption that the bail set by the court or magistrate in the demanding state is the proper amount of bail in this state.

